lrec2010_examples/haber.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund GV1 GV2 GV3
LEXICON Root
haber Verb1;


!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
he+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:he #;
has+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:has #;
ha+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:ha #;
hay+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:hay #;
hemos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:hemos #;
hebéis+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:habéis #;
han+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:han #;

había+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:había #;
habías+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:habías #;
había+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:había #;
habíamos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:habíamos #;
habíais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:habíais #;
habían+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:habían #;

hube+V+1p+sg+tPret:hube #;
hubiste+V+2p+sg+tPret:hubiste #;
hubo+V+3p+sg+tPret:hubo #;
hubimos+V+1p+pl+tPret:hubimos #;
hubisteis+V+2p+pl+tPret:hubisteis #;
hubieron+V+3p+pl+tPret:hubieron #;

habré+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:habré #;
habrás+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:habrás #;
habrá+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:habrá #;
habremos+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:habremos #;
habréis+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:habréis #;
habrán+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:habrán #;

habría+V+1p+sg+mCond:habría #;
habrías+V+2p+sg+mCond:habrías #;
habría+V+3p+sg+mCond:habría #;
habríamos+V+1p+pl+mCond:habríamos #;
habríais+V+2p+pl+mCond:habríais #;
habrían+V+3p+pl+mCond:habrían #;

haya+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:haya #;
hayas+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:hayas #;
haya+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:haya #;
hayamos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:hayamos #;
hayáis+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:hayáis #;
hayan+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:hayan #;

hubiera+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubiera #;
hubieras+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubieras #;
hubiera+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubiera #;
hubiéramos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubiéramos #;
hubierais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubierais #;
hubieran+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubieran #;
hubiese+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubiese #;
hubieses+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubieses #;
hubiese+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:hubiese #;
hubiésemos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubiésemos #;
hubieseis+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubieseis #;
hubiesen+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:hubiesen #;

hubiere+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:hubiere #;
hubieres+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:hubieres #;
hubiere+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:hubiere #;
hubiéremos+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:hubiéremos #;
hubiereis+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:hubiereis #;
hubieren+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:hubieren #;

habido+V+pastPart:habido #;

habido+V+Gerund:habiendo #;
